Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1. Limitations on Creditors' Remedies

§ 40-14-501.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “Uniform Consumer Credit Code — Remedies and Penalties.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-5-101

.

Cross references. —

As to territorial application of provisions, see § 40-14-120(d).

§ 40-14-502.
Scope.

This part applies to actions or other proceedings to enforce rights arising from consumer credit sales, consumer leases, and consumer loans; and, in addition, to extortionate extensions of credit (W.S.

40-14-507

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-102; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-102.

Quoted

in

Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 40-14-503.
Restrictions on deficiency judgments in consumer credit sales.

This section applies to a consumer credit sale of goods or services.

If the seller repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods which were the subject of the sale and in which he has a security interest and the cash price of the goods repossessed or surrendered was one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or less, the buyer is not personally liable to the seller for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale of the goods, and the seller is not obligated to resell the collateral.

If the seller repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods which were not the subject of the sale but in which he has a security interest to secure a debt arising from a sale of goods or services or a combined sale of goods and services and the cash price of the sale was one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or less, the buyer is not personally liable to the seller for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale.

For the purpose of determining the unpaid balance of consolidated debts or debts pursuant to revolving charge accounts, the allocation of payments to a debt shall be determined in the same manner as provided for determining the amount of debt secured by various security interests (W.S.

40-14-243

).

The buyer may be liable in damages to the seller if the buyer has wrongfully damaged the collateral or if, after default and demand, the buyer has wrongfully failed to make the collateral available to the seller.

If the seller elects to bring an action against the buyer for a debt arising from a consumer credit sale of goods or services, when under this section he would not be entitled to a deficiency judgment if he repossessed the collateral, and obtains judgment:

He may not repossess the collateral; and

The collateral is not subject to levy or sale on execution or similar proceedings pursuant to the judgment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-103; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-103; Laws 1973, ch. 190, § 2.

§ 40-14-504.
No garnishment before judgment.

Prior to entry of judgment in an action against the debtor for debt arising from a consumer credit sale, a consumer lease, or a consumer loan, the creditor may not attach unpaid earnings of the debtor by garnishment or like proceedings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-104; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-104.

§ 40-14-505.
Limitation on garnishment.

For the purposes of this part:

“Disposable earnings” means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of amounts required by law to be withheld; and

“Garnishment” means any legal or equitable procedure through which the earnings of an individual are required to be withheld for payment of a debt.

The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual for any workweek which is subjected to garnishment to enforce payment of a judgment arising from a consumer credit sale, consumer lease, or consumer loan may not exceed the lesser of:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of his disposable earnings for that week; or

The amount by which his disposable earnings for that week exceed thirty (30) times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by section (6)(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, U.S.C. tit. 29, § 206(a)(1), in effect at the time the earnings are payable;

In the case of earnings for a pay period other than a week, the administrator shall prescribe by rule a multiple of the federal minimum hourly wage equivalent in effect to that set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) of this section.

No court may make, execute, or enforce an order or process in violation of this section.

An individual’s disposable earnings shall remain exempt to the extent provided in subsection (b) of this section if the earnings were deposited in the individual’s account with a financial institution within twenty (20) calendar days prior to service of a writ of garnishment against the individual’s account with the financial institution, on the day of service of the writ or within ten (10) business days after service of the writ. This subsection does not create any obligation on the part of a financial institution to conduct an investigation of the individual’s account or otherwise make any determination about a judgment creditor’s rights to funds in the account other than the financial institution’s obligation to file with the court and serve on the individual an answer to the writ of garnishment. A judgment creditor may request that the court issue writs of garnishment to an individual’s employer and the individual’s financial institution at the same time; provided, however, that should the judgment creditor successfully garnish earnings as shown on an individual’s pay advice, then the remaining proceeds from such pay advice deposited into an account with a financial institution shall be entirely exempt from execution, notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section.

As used in this section, “financial institution” means as defined in W.S. 13-1-401(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-105; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-105; Laws 2019, ch. 70, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to attachment, replevin and garnishment, see chapter 15 of title 1.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d) and (e).

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 70 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply only to writs of garnishment issued on or after the effective date of this act."

Unpaid wages or other earnings. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 1-15-408(a) and 40-14-505(a)(ii) deal with unpaid wages or other earnings; they do not deal with wages or other earnings that have made their way into a debtor's bank account, and the law clearly limits the exception to “accrued and unpaid” earnings. Royal v. Walsh (In re Walsh), 2004 WY 96, 96 P.3d 1,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of creditor for excessive attachment or garnishment, 56 ALR3d 493.

§ 40-14-506.
No discharge from employment for garnishment.

No employer shall discharge an employee for the reason that a creditor of the employee has subjected or attempted to subject unpaid earnings of the employee to garnishment or like proceedings directed to the employer for the purpose of paying a judgment arising from a consumer credit sale, consumer lease, or consumer loan.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-106; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-106.

§ 40-14-507.
Extortionate extensions of credit.

If it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time an extension of credit is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person, the repayment of the extension of credit is unenforceable through civil judicial processes against the debtor.

If it is shown that an extension of credit was made at an annual rate exceeding forty-five percent (45%) calculated according to the actuarial method and that the creditor then had a reputation for the use or threat of use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person to collect extensions of credit or to punish the nonrepayment thereof, there is prima facie evidence that the extension of credit was unenforceable under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-107; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-107.

Cross references. —

As to blackmail, see §

6-2-402

.

§ 40-14-508.
Unconscionability.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, consumer lease, or consumer loan, if the court as a matter of law finds the agreement or any clause of the agreement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the agreement, or it may enforce the remainder of the agreement without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

If it is claimed or appears to the court that the agreement or any clause thereof may be unconscionable the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

For the purpose of this section, a charge or practice expressly permitted by this act is not in itself unconscionable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-108; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-108.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “fraudulent” or “unconscionable” agreement or conduct within meaning of state consumer credit protection act, 42 ALR4th 293.